Utah statutes.
30-5-1.   Definitions.
As used in this act:
(1)  "District court" means the district court with proper jurisdiction over
the grandchild.
(2)  "Grandchild" means the child with respect to whom a grandparent is
seeking visitation rights under this chapter.
(3)  "Grandparent" means a person whose child, either by blood, marriage, or
adoption, is the parent of the grandchild.
